Utah statutes.
11-25-20.   Moneys received as trust funds -- Depository as trustee.
All moneys received pursuant to the provisions of this part, whether proceeds
from the sale of bonds or revenues, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be
held and applied solely as provided in this part. Any bank or trust company in
which these moneys are deposited shall act as trustee of the moneys and shall
hold and apply the same for the purposes specified in this part, subject to
the terms of the resolution authorizing the bonds.
